Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2719XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 333 Section 1. Section 321.247, subsection 1, paragraphs a and 1 c, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. Incorporated areas may, upon approval of their governing 3 body, allow A local authority shall not prohibit the operation 4 of golf carts on city streets by persons possessing a valid 5 driverâs license. However, a golf cart shall not be operated 6 upon on a city street which is a primary road extension through 7 the city but shall be allowed to cross a city street which is a 8 primary road extension through the city. 9 c. Golf carts operated on city streets shall be equipped 10 with adequate brakes and shall meet any other safety 11 requirements imposed by the governing body of the local 12 authority . 13